apertium-ell.ell.dix
    <pardef n="βραδιν/ός__adj">
      <e><p><l>ή</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ής</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ή</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ή</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ές</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ών</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ές</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ές</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ός</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ού</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ό</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έ</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οί</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ών</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ούς</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οί</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ό</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ού</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ό</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ό</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ά</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ών</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ά</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ά</l><r>ός<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ενδιαφ/έρων__adj">
      <e><p><l>έρουσα</l><r>έρων<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έρουςας</l><r>έρων<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έρουσα</l><r>έρων<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έρουσες</l><r>έρων<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ερουσών</l><r>έρων<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έρουσες</l><r>έρων<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έρων</l><r>έρων<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έροντος</l><r>έρων<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έροντα</l><r>έρων<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έροντες</l><r>έρων<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ερόντων</l><r>έρων<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έροντες</l><r>έρων<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έρον</l><r>έρων<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έροντος</l><r>έρων<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έρον</l><r>έρων<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έροντα</l><r>έρων<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ερόντων</l><r>έρων<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έροντα</l><r>έρων<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ε/ύκολος__adj">
      <e><p><l>υκολότερος</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολη</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολης</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολη</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολη</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολες</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολων</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολες</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολες</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολος</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολου</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολο</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολε</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολοι</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολων</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολους</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολοι</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολο</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολου</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολο</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολο</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολα</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολων</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολα</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύκολα</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>υκολότατος</l><r>ύκολος<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ναρκωτικός"><i>ναρκωτικ</i><par n="βραδιν/ός__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="βραδινός"><i>βραδιν</i><par n="βραδιν/ός__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="αλβανικός"><i>αλβανικ</i><par n="βραδιν/ός__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ενδιαφέρων"><i>ενδιαφ</i><par n="ενδιαφ/έρων__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ερωτηματικός"><i>ερωτηματικ</i><par n="βραδιν/ός__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="αποικιακός"><i>αποικιακ</i><par n="βραδιν/ός__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="οδοντικός"><i>οδοντικ</i><par n="βραδιν/ός__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="εύκολος"><i>ε</i><par n="ε/ύκολος__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="επιληπτικός"><i>επιληπτικ</i><par n="βραδιν/ός__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="μεσημβρινός"><i>μεσημβριν</i><par n="βραδιν/ός__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="μεσημεριανός"><i>μεσημεριαν</i><par n="βραδιν/ός__adj"/></e>
